src/fst/test/gt-norm-yamls/N-A-ohkíímaan_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:
  
  Noun - ohkíímaana - ok : # -m animate noun, dog AEW NA1
     ohkiimaana+NA+Sg: ohkíímaana
     ohkiimaana+NA+Pl: ohkíímaaniksi
     ohkiimaana+NA+Obv: ohkíímaani
     ohkiimaana+NA+Non: ohkíímaaní
     
     ohkiimaana+NA+Px1Sg+Sg: nitohkíímaana
     ohkiimaana+NA+Px1Sg+Pl: nitohkíímaaniksi
     ohkiimaana+NA+Px1Sg+Obv: nitohkíímaani
     ohkiimaana+NA+Px1Sg+Non: nitohkíímaani
     
     ohkiimaana+NA+Px1Pl+Sg: nitohkíímaannaana
     ohkiimaana+NA+Px1Pl+Pl: nitohkíímaannaaniksi
     ohkiimaana+NA+Px1Pl+Obv: nitohkíímaannaani
     ohkiimaana+NA+Px1Pl+Non: nitohkíímaannaani

     ohkiimaana+NA+Px21Pl+Sg: kitohkíímaannoona
     ohkiimaana+NA+Px21Pl+Pl: kitohkíímaannooniksi
     ohkiimaana+NA+Px21Pl+Obv: kitohkíímaannooni
     ohkiimaana+NA+Px21Pl+Non: kitohkíímaannooni

     ohkiimaana+NA+Px2Sg+Sg: kitohkíímaana
     ohkiimaana+NA+Px2Sg+Pl: kitohkíímaaniksi
     ohkiimaana+NA+Px2Sg+Obv: kitohkíímaani
     ohkiimaana+NA+Px2Sg+Non: kitohkíímaani

     ohkiimaana+NA+Px2Pl+Sg: kitohkíímaanoaawa
     ohkiimaana+NA+Px2Pl+Pl: kitohkíímaanoaawaiksi
     ohkiimaana+NA+Px2Pl+Obv: kitohkíímaanoaawayi
     ohkiimaana+NA+Px2Pl+Non: kitohkíímaanoaawai

     ohkiimaana+NA+Px3Sg+Pl: otohkíímaaniksi
     ohkiimaana+NA+Px3Sg+Obv: otohkíímaani
     ohkiimaana+NA+Px3Sg+Non: otohkíímaani

     ohkiimaana+NA+Px3Pl+Pl: otohkíímaanoaawaiksi
     ohkiimaana+NA+Px3Pl+Obv: otohkíímaanoaawayi
     ohkiimaana+NA+Px3Pl+Non: otohkíímaanoaawai
